District of Columbia statutes.
38-3003

Commission members from District.

The 7 Commission members from the District of Columbia shall be:

(1)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia;

(2)

The Chairman of the Council of the District of Columbia;

(3)

The Chairperson of the Committee on Education of the Council of the District of Columbia;

(4)

The President of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia;

(5)

The Superintendent of Schools of the District of Columbia;

(6)

The Chairperson of the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia; and

(7)

The President of the University of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-65, § 4, 31 DCR 198

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-3002.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2303.

References in Text

The “Committee on Education of the Council of the District of Columbia,” referred to in paragraph (3), has been changed to the “Committee on Education and Libraries” by Resolution 7-1 which adopted the Rules Resolution for Council Period VII, effective January 2, 1987.